District of Columbia statutes.
1-321.02

Applicability of this subchapter.

This subchapter shall apply to the boards, commissions, and committees and the members thereof, respectively, established pursuant to the following sections: 1-301.01, 3-1601 to 3-1631 [repealed], 3-1701 to 3-1719 [repealed], 3-2001 to 3-2028 [repealed], 3-2101 to 3-2132 [repealed], 3-2901 to 3-2943 [repealed], 3-2301.01 to 3-2301.10 [repealed], 3-2401 to 3-2422 [repealed], 3-2501 to 3-2508 [repealed], 3-2601 to 3-2619 [repealed], 47-2886.01 to 47-2886.18, 3-2701 to 3-2707 [repealed], 42-1701 to 42-1709, and 47-2801 to 47-2849.

History

July 14, 1956, 70 Stat. 533, ch. 590, § 2
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209,§ 35(d), 30 DCR 390

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-321.01, § 1-321.03, § 1-321.04, and § 1-321.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-349.
1973 Ed., § 1-255.

References in Text

Sections 3-1601 through 3-1631 were repealed by D.C. Law 9-184, § 604, 39 DCR 8208, effective March 13, 1992.

Sections 3-1701 to 3-1719 and 3-2001 to 3-2028 were repealed by D.C. Law 9-245,§ 38, 40 DCR 660, effective March 17, 1993.

Sections 3-2601, 3-2886.05 through 3-2886.07, and 3-2702 have been omitted at the direction of the District of Columbia Codification Counsel.

Sections 3-2101 to 3-2132, 3-2901 to 3-2943, 3-2301.01 to 3-2301.10, 3-2401 to 3-2422 and 3-2601 to 3-2619 were repealed by D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104, effective March 26, 1986.

Sections 47-2801 through 47-2805 were repealed by D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(c), 45 DCR 1172, effective April 29, 1998.

Sections 3-2601 to 3-2608 and 3-2701 to 3-2707, referred to in this section, were repealed April 17, 1999.